ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Accesorii audio > Accesorii pentru căști audio și căști audio cu microfon > Huse pentru căști: Huse de transport pentru căști intraauriculare; Huse pentru căști și seturi de căști supraauriculare
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Aksesuarları > Kulaklık Aksesuarları > Kulaklık Taşıma Kılıfları: Kulak İçi Kulaklık Taşıma Çantaları; Kulak Üstü Kulaklık ve Kulaklık Kılıfları
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Acessórios de áudio > Acessórios de auscultadores e auriculares > Estojos para transporte de auscultadores: Estojos de transporte para auriculares intra-auriculares; Estojos para auscultadores e auricular over-ear
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lyd – tilbehør > Tilbehør til hovedtelefoner og headsets > Bæretasker til hovedtelefoner: Etuier til øretelefon og in-ear-hovedtelefon; Over-ear-hovedtelefon og headset-æsker
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音響配件 > 耳機配件 > 耳機攜帶箱: 耳塞及入耳式耳機攜帶盒; 覆耳式耳機及耳麥盒
es: Electrónica > Audio > Accesorios de audio > Accesorios para auriculares > Estuches para auriculares: Estuches de transporte de auriculares in-ear; Estuches de auriculares over-ear
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Accessories > Headphone & Headset Accessories > Headphone Carrying Cases: Earbud & In-Ear Headphone Carrying Cases; Over-Ear Headphone & Headset Cases
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiolaitteet > Kuulokkeet ja kuuloketarvikkeet > Kuulokkeiden kantokotelot: Nappikuulokkeen kantokotelo; Kuulokkeen kantokotelo
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Αξεσουάρ ήχου > Αξεσουάρ ακουστικών & headset > Θήκες μεταφοράς ακουστικών: Θήκες μεταφοράς για ακουστικά ψείρες και ακουστικά εντός αυτιού; Θήκες για επικεφαλής ακουστικά & headset
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvuková zařízení – příslušenství > Příslušenství ke sluchátkům a náhlavním soupravám > Pouzdra na sluchátka: Pouzdra pro pecková a špuntová sluchátka; Pouzdra pro náhlavní sluchátka a headsety
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Acessórios para áudio > Acessórios para fones de ouvido > Estojos para transporte de fones de ouvido: Cases para fones de ouvido intra-auriculares; Cases para headsets e fones de ouvido over-ear
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > อุปกรณ์ทางเสียง > อุปกรณ์หูฟังและชุดหูฟัง > กระเป๋าใส่หูฟัง: กระเป๋าใส่หูฟังอินเอียร์และหูฟังแบบเอียร์บัด; กระเป๋าใส่หูฟังครอบหูและชุดหูฟัง
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkiegészítők > Fejhallgató és fülhallgató-kiegészítők > Fejhallgatóhordozó-tokok: Fülhallgató és fülbe helyezhető fejhallgató hordtáskák; Fül feletti fejhallgató- és headset-tokok
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиоаксесоари > Аксесоари за слушалки > Калъфи за носене на слушалки: Калъфи за слушалки тип „тапи“ и вътреушни слушалки; Калъфи за надушни слушалки и слушалки с микрофон
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio dodatki > Dodatki za slušalke in naglavne slušalke > Torbice za slušalke: Etuiji za ušesne slušalke; Etuiji za čezušesne slušalke
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audioaccessoires > Accessoires voor oor- en hoofdtelefoons > Draagdozen voor oortelefoons: Oordopjes en in-ear koptelefoon tasjes; Over-ear koptelefoon en headset cases
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydtilbehør > Tilbehør til hodetelefoner og headset > Bærevesker for hodetelefoner: Oppbevaringsetuier til ørepropper og in-ear-hodetelefoner; Etuier til over-øret-hodetelefoner og -headset
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频配件 > 头戴式耳机配件 > 耳机便携包: 入耳式耳机收纳盒; 头戴式耳机和耳麦收纳盒
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 부대용품 > 헤드폰/헤드셋 부대용품 > 헤드폰 휴대용 케이스: 이어버드 및 인이어 헤드폰 휴대 케이스; 오버이어 헤드폰 및 헤드셋 케이스
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio pribor > Pribor za slušalice i slušalice s mikrofonom > Torbice za slušalice: Torbice za ušne slušalice; Torbice za slušalice preko uha
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Phụ kiện âm thanh > Phụ kiện tai nghe > Hộp đựng tai nghe: Hộp đựng tai nghe trong tai; Hộp đựng tai nghe qua tai
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオアクセサリー > ヘッドフォン・ヘッドセット関連用品 > ヘッドフォン持ち運び用ケース: イヤホン・インイヤーヘッドホン用ケース; オーバーイヤーヘッドホン・ヘッドセット用ケース
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre slúchadlá a náhlavné súpravy > Puzdrá na prenos slúchadiel: Puzdra na ušné slúchadlá; Puzdra na slúchadlá a headsety
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudtillbehör > Tillbehör till hörlurar och headsets > Fodral för hörlurar: Fodral för öronsnäckor och in-ear-hörlurar; Fodral för over-ear-hörlurar och headset
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Akcesoria audio > Akcesoria do słuchawek i zestawów słuchawkowych > Futerały na słuchawki: Etui do przenoszenia słuchawek dousznych i dokanałowych; Etui słuchawek nausznych i zestawów słuchawkowych
it: Elettronica > Audio > Accessori audio > Accessori per cuffie e auricolari > Custodie per cuffie: Custodie da trasporto per auricolari e cuffie in-ear; Custodie per cuffie over-ear e headset
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiozubehör > Kopfhörer- & Headset-Zubehör > Transporttaschen für Kopfhörer: Taschen für Ohrhörer und In-Ear-Kopfhörer; Taschen für Over-Ear-Kopfhörer und Headsets
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso priedai > Ausinių ir ausinių su mikrofonais priedai > Ausinių nešiojimo dėklai: Ausinių ir ausinių su lankeliu nešiojimo dėklai; Over-ear ausidės ir headset dėžės
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Аксессуары для аудиотехники > Аксессуары для наушников и гарнитур > Футляры для наушников: Футляры для вкладышей и внутриканальных наушников; Футляры для накладных наушников и гарнитур
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Accessoires audio > Accessoires pour écouteurs et casques audio > Étuis de transport pour écouteurs: Étuis de transport pour écouteurs intra-auriculaires; Étuis pour casques et écouteurs supra-auriculaires